Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 5 Service Creditable Toward Retirement

47-16-80.
Credit for prior service in the armed forces of the United States or as a peace officer.

In addition to listing and claiming credit for prior services as a sheriff under paragraph (4) of Code Section 47-16-40, the applicant may elect to list and claim credit for service in the armed forces of the United States, not to exceed four years, and service as a peace officer other than as a sheriff, not to exceed four years, provided that he was employed during such period as a peace officer by the state, a municipality, or any other political subdivision of this state and was required by the terms of such employment, whether by election or appointment, to devote his full time to the duties of a peace officer. Upon approval or acceptance of such claims by the board, the applicant shall be credited with such service as a basis for future contemplated retirement, provided that credit for such service shall be available only if the applicant shall have served as a sheriff for a minimum of eight years subsequent to December 31, 1960, and subsequent to periods of service for which credit under this Code section is claimed; provided, further, that amounts due under paragraph (5) of Code Section 47-16-40 have been paid for such periods.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 630, § 12; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1203, § 7.

Cross references.

Creditable service not allowed for military service from which discharge was other than honorable, §

47-1-11

.

47-16-81.
Credit for prior service as sheriff, member of armed forces of
United States, or peace officer; notice; amendment of application.

Any other provisions of this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, any active member who has previously waived his claim for credit for any prior service as a sheriff, member of the armed forces of the United States, or peace officer, by his failure to comply with paragraph (2), (4), or (5) of Code Section 47-16-40 or by his failure to list such prior service in his application for membership, shall be entitled, as of May 1, 1980, to claim credit for any such prior service in accordance with this chapter and subsections (b) through (d) of this Code section.

Any such member shall give written notice to the secretary-treasurer of his claim for credit for such prior service, together with an amendment to his application for membership, in such form as may be approved by the board. The amendment shall list all such periods of prior service for which he intends to claim credit as a basis for his future retirement. The notice and amendment shall be filed prior to July 31, 1980, or within the first 30 days of any new term of office of such member.

At the time such member gives written notification to the secretary-treasurer, such member must also tender payment of all amounts due under paragraph (5) of Code Section 47-16-40 for the prior service listed in the amendment to his application for membership, together with interest on such amounts at 8 percent per annum from the date of acceptance of his original application for membership.

Upon approval or acceptance of the amendment by the board and receipt of such member’s payment of the amount with interest due under subsection (c) of this Code section, he shall be credited with his claimed prior service as a sheriff, member of the armed forces of the United States, or as a peace officer as a basis for his future retirement.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 461, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47.

47-16-82.
Credit for prior service as a warden of a county correctional institution.

Any member who has served as a sheriff for at least 12 years and who served as a warden of a county correctional institution for at least ten years prior to his service as a sheriff may, upon application to the board, receive four years of prior service credit for such service as a warden.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 705, § 2.

47-16-83.
Payment of dues as prerequisite to credit for service on and after January 1, 1961.

No credit for any type of service after and including January 1, 1961, shall be given any member unless regular monthly dues shall have been paid therefor as provided for and required by this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 630, § 16.

47-16-84.
Members appointed to fill anticipated vacancies in office of sheriff prior to becoming members.

Anything in this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, any member who, prior to becoming a member, was appointed to fill an anticipated vacancy in the office of sheriff and who served in that capacity shall be eligible for and, upon application, shall receive service credit for such service.

Any such member shall give written notice to the secretary-treasurer of his claim for credit for such service, together with an amendment to his application for membership, in such form as may be approved by the board. The amendment shall list all such periods of service for which he intends to claim credit as a basis for his future retirement. The notice and amendment shall be filed prior to August 31, 1992, or within the first 30 days of any new term of office of such member.

At the time such member gives written notification to the secretary-treasurer, such member must also tender payment of all amounts due under paragraph (5) of Code Section 47-16-40 for the service listed in the amendment to his application for membership, together with interest on such amounts at 8 percent per annum from the date of acceptance of his original membership.

Service credit granted pursuant to this Code section shall be deemed to be service as a qualified and commissioned sheriff of a county in the State of Georgia for purposes of eligibility for retirement benefits provided in Code Section 47-16-100; provided, however, that for purposes of such Code section, such service shall be deemed performed after July 1, 1988.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-16-84

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2523, § 1.